Utah statutes.
73-23-5.   Interim committee study responsibilities of Division of Water
Resources.
The Division of Water Resources shall:
(1)  evaluate the first year's operation of the West Desert Pumping Project;
(2)  define the operational range and limitations of the West Desert Pumping
Project as an emergency flood control project;
(3)  assess the feasibility of developing a cooperative ownership, operation,
and maintenance plan for the project with public and private entities;
(4)  identify long-term water development opportunities upstream of the Great
Salt Lake; and
(5)  report their findings to the Energy, Natural Resources and Agriculture
Interim Committee before October 1, 1988.
